Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.594

Personal information—Consumer protection.

(1) Any waiver of the provisions of RCW 42.56.590 or 42.56.592 is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(2)(a) Any consumer injured by a violation of RCW 42.56.590 may institute a civil action to recover damages.

(b) Any agency that violates, proposes to violate, or has violated RCW 42.56.590 may be enjoined.

(c) The rights and remedies available under RCW 42.56.590 are cumulative to each other and to any other rights and remedies available under law.

[ 2019 c 241 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 241: See note following RCW 19.255.010.